Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-302]
Supplemental application materials. In addition to the information
required in section 431:19-102(c) and (d), each sponsored captive insurance
company applicant that segregates the risks of its participants through one or
more protected cells shall file with the commissioner the following:

(1) All contracts or draft contracts between the
sponsored captive insurance company and its participants;

(2) A description of the means by which the assets,
liabilities, income, and expenses of each protected cell shall be segregated
from those of other protected cells in the sponsored captive insurance company,
and reported to the commissioner; and

(3) A fair and equitable plan for allocating direct
and indirect expenses to each protected cell. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next